Hawaii statutes.
§263A-7 Notice to Federal Aviation
Administration. When it is determined under this chapter that a
nonresident's privilege to operate an aircraft from a state or private airport
shall be prohibited, the director of transportation shall so inform the administrator
of the Federal Aviation Administration in writing. [L 1991, c 274, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next